Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3786.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be
codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:
Effective July 1, 2026, the compensation paid to each Park
Ranger of the Division of State Parks of the Oklahoma Tourism and
Recreation Department shall be increased by fifteen percent (15%).
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.
SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.

60-2-14367 JL 01/01/26
Req. No. 14367 Page 1